Utah statutes.
77-23b-9.   Judicial scope of chapter remedies and sanctions.

The remedies and sanctions under this chapter are the only judicial remedies and sanctions for nonconstitutional violations of this chapter.



Enacted by Chapter 251, 1988 General Session

